District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
7 act may be cited as the “District of Columbia Government Data Privacy and Protection Act of
8 2026”.
9 Sec 2. Definitions.
10 For the purposes of this act, the term:
11 (1) “Affirmative consent” means a clear affirmative act signifying a covered
12 individual’s freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous agreement to the processing of
13 personal data for a purpose that is not required by law or necessary to provide a government
14 service requested by the individual.
1

15 (2) “Agency” shall include agencies and independent agencies as defined in
16 section 1, paragraphs (1) and (13) of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit
17 Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139, D.C. Official Code § 1–
18 603.01).
19 (3) “Authenticate” means to use reasonable means to determine that a request to
20 exercise any of the rights afforded under this act is being made by, or on behalf of, the covered
21 individual who is entitled to exercise such rights with respect to the personal data at issue.
22 (4) “Collect” and “collecting” mean gathering, obtaining, receiving, accessing, or
23 otherwise acquiring personal data of covered individuals by an agency.
24 (5) “Covered individual” means an individual or natural person who currently
25 resides in the District of Columbia, is currently employed in the District of Columbia, or who
26 accesses, uses, or otherwise interacts with District services, programs, systems, or benefits
27 provided by a District agency, regardless of the individual’s place of domicile or permanent
28 residence.
29 (6) “Personal data” means any information that is linked to an identified or
30 identifiable covered individual. “Personal data” does not include de-identified or aggregated
31 data, or publicly available information.
32 (7) “Process” or “processing” means any operation or set of operations performed,
33 whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or on sets of personal data, such as the
34 use, storage, disclosure, analysis, deletion or modification of personal data.
35 (8) “Sale of personal data” means the exchange of personal data for monetary or
36 other consideration by an agency to a third party.
37 (9) “Sensitive data” means personal data that includes:
2

38 (A) Racial or ethnic origin, religious beliefs, mental or physical health
39 condition or diagnosis, status as pregnant, sex life, sexual orientation, gender identity, union
40 membership, income level or indebtedness, or citizenship or immigration status;
41 (B) Health data or medical information;
42 (C) Genetic or biometric data;
43 (D) Personal data of a covered individual that is under the age of 18; and,
44 (E) A government-issued identifier, including a Social Security number,
45 passport number or driver's license number, that is not required by law to be displayed in public.
46 (10) “Third party” means any non-governmental entity, external entity, or person
47 that receives, collects, stores, processes, accesses, or transfers personal data from, on behalf of,
48 or at the direction of a District government agency.
49 (11) “Transfer” means to disclose, release, disseminate, make available, license,
50 rent, or share personal data to a third party orally, in writing, electronically, or by any other
51 means.
52 Sec 3. Duties of agencies.
53 (a) An agency that processes personal data shall:
54 (1) Limit the collection, processing, and transfer of personal data to what is
55 reasonably necessary to provide or maintain:
56 (A) A specific product or service requested by the covered individual to
57 whom the data pertains including routine administrative, operational, or service-provision
58 activities necessary to deliver the government service requested by the covered individual; or
3

59 (B) A communication by the agency to the covered individual that is
60 reasonably anticipated within the context of the relationship between the agency and the covered
61 individual.
62 (2) Not collect, process, or transfer sensitive data concerning a covered individual
63 except when such collection, processing, or transfer is strictly necessary to provide or maintain a
64 specific product or service requested by the covered individual to whom the sensitive data
65 pertains.
66 (3) Not sell sensitive data of any covered individual.
67 (4) Not sell personal data of any covered individual without obtaining the covered
68 individual’s affirmative, informed consent.
69 (5) Not transfer personal data concerning a covered individual to a third party
70 without obtaining the covered individual’s affirmative consent.
71 (6) Establish, implement and maintain reasonable administrative, technical and
72 physical data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity and accessibility of
73 personal data.
74 (7) Provide a mechanism for a covered individual to revoke the covered
75 individual’s affirmative consent and cease to process the data as soon as practicable, but not later
76 than 45 days after the receipt of such request.
77 (8) Direct to a clear, accessible privacy notice, as established by the Chief Privacy
78 Officer (“CPO”), regarding data practices and rights of covered individuals that includes:
79 (A) How a covered individual may exercise their rights, including how a
80 covered individual may appeal an agency decision;
4

81 (B) The categories of personal data collected and processed by the agency,
82 including a separate list of categories of sensitive data collected and processed by the agency;
83 (C) The purpose for collecting and processing each category of personal
84 data;
85 (D) The categories of personal data that the government agency transfers
86 to third parties, if any, and the purposes for those transfers;
87 (E) The length of time the agency retains each category of personal data;
88 and,
89 (F) Information on how a covered individual may exercise the right to opt
90 out of such sales or processing.
91 (9) Not deny services or benefits to a covered individual for exercising rights
92 under this act.
93 (b) Agencies may only share personal data with third parties if:
94 (1) The sharing is necessary for a governmental purpose;
95 (2) The personal data does not include sensitive data, unless required by law; and,
96 (3) The third party agrees to comply with equivalent or greater privacy
97 protections, including:
98 (A) The ability of the agency to request that the third party delete or return
99 all personal data to the agency as requested, unless retention of the personal data is required by
100 law;
101 (B) Providing to the agency all information in its possession necessary to
102 demonstrate the third party’s compliance with the obligations of this section;
5

103 (C) Only processing and transferring the data it receives from the agency
104 to the extent necessary to provide a service requested by the agency; and
105 (D) Detailing the type of data subject to processing and the duration of the
106 processing and data retention.
107 (4) The sharing is documented and subject to audit.
108 (c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict an agency’s ability to:
109 (1) Comply with District laws and regulations;
110 (2) Comply with a civil, criminal or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena or
111 summons by federal or other governmental authorities, except as prohibited by District law;
112 (3) Provide a product or service specifically requested by the covered individual;
113 (4) Assist another agency with any of the obligations under this act;
114 (5) Collect or process personal data to accomplish the agencies’ mission and core
115 functions; and,
116 (6) Ensure the data security and integrity of personal data as required by this act,
117 protect against spam, or protect and maintain networks and systems, including through
118 diagnostics, debugging, and repairs.
119 Sec 4. Requirements of third parties.
120 (a) A contract between an agency and a third party shall govern the third party’s data
121 processing procedures with respect to processing performed on behalf of the agency. The
122 contract shall be binding and clearly set forth instructions for processing data, the nature and
123 purpose of processing, the type of data subject to processing, the duration of processing and the
124 rights and obligations of both parties. The third party shall adhere to the instructions of the
125 agency and only process and transfer the data it receives from the agency to the extent necessary
6

126 to provide a service requested by the agency, as set out in the contract. The contract shall also
127 require that the third party:
128 (1) Ensure that each person processing personal data is subject to a duty of
129 confidentiality with respect to the data;
130 (2) At the agency’s direction, delete or return all personal data to the agency as
131 requested at the end of the provision of services, unless retention of the personal data is required
132 by law;
133 (3) Upon the reasonable request of the agency, make available to the agency all
134 information in its possession necessary to demonstrate the third parties compliance with the
135 obligations under this act;
136 (4) After providing the agency an opportunity to object, engage any
137 subcontractor pursuant to a written contract that requires the subcontractor to meet the
138 obligations of the third party with respect to the personal data; and,
139 (5) Be prohibited from combining personal data that the third party receives from
140 or on behalf of an agency with personal data that the third party receives from or on behalf of
141 another person or collects from the interaction of the third party with an individual.
142 (b) A third party shall establish, implement and maintain reasonable administrative,
143 technical and physical data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity and
144 accessibility of personal data appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at issue.
145 (c) Any third party that receives personal data from an agency shall, upon receiving a
146 request for such data from any federal, state, or local government entity:
7

147 (1) Review the legal validity of the request, including whether it is lawfully
148 issued, within the authority of the requesting entity, and narrowly tailored to the data sought;
149 and,
150 (2) Challenge the request in a court of competent jurisdiction where the third
151 party has a reasonable basis to believe that the request is overbroad, not supported by sufficient
152 legal process, or inconsistent with applicable law or contractual obligations.
153 (d)(1) A third party shall not disclose personal data in response to a government request
154 unless the request is accompanied by a warrant, subpoena, court order, or another form of legally
155 binding process recognized under applicable law.
156 (2) The third party shall promptly notify the originating agency of any
157 government request for data, unless legally prohibited. Where not prohibited by law, the third
158 party shall make reasonable efforts to notify affected individuals prior to disclosure.
159 (3) If disclosure is required, the third party shall disclose only the minimum
160 amount of data necessary to comply with the request, take reasonable steps to narrow or modify
161 the request, and seek protective orders or confidentiality agreements where appropriate.
162 (e) A third party may not voluntarily provide personal data to any government entity
163 absent a legally binding request or express authorization from the originating agency and
164 consistency with District law.
165 (f) Third parties shall maintain records of all government requests received and provide
166 periodic reports to the agency, including the number of requests, the type of legal process used,
167 and whether requests were challenged.
168 (g) All agency contracts involving the transfer of personal data shall require compliance
169 with this section as a material term of the agreement.
8

170 (h) Failure to comply with this section shall constitute a material breach of contract and
171 may result in termination, damages, and debarment from future District contracts.
172 Sec 5. Rights of covered individuals
173 (a) Covered individuals shall have the right to:
174 (1) Confirm whether or not an agency is collecting or processing the covered
175 individual’s personal data and obtain:
176 (A) Categories of data collected;
177 (B) Purpose of processing; and,
178 (C) Categories of recipients;
179 (2) Obtain a copy of the personal data collected or processed;
180 (3) Correct inaccuracies in the covered individual's personal data;
181 (4) Delete personal data provided by, or obtained about, the covered individual,
182 unless the data is required by law to be retained; and,
183 (5) Obtain from an agency a list of specific third parties, other than natural
184 persons, to which the agency has transferred or sold:
185 (A) The covered individual’s personal data; or,
186 (B) Any personal data.
187 (6) Opt-out of the transfer or sale of personal data for purposes not required by
188 law or necessary to provide a government service.
189 (b) (1) Agencies shall respond to verified requests within sixty days after receipt of the
190 request.
9

191 (2) The agency shall inform the covered individual within forty-five days after
192 receipt of the request of any justification for declining to provide the requested information and
193 provide instructions for how to appeal the decision.
194 (c) A covered individual may exercise rights under this section by a secure and reliable
195 means established by CPO and described to the covered individual in the agency’s privacy
196 notice.
197 (d) Information provided in response to a covered individuals’ request shall be provided
198 by an agency once per covered individual during any four-month period.
199 (e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide a basis for a private right of
200 action or any other remedy, claim, or cause of action for any violation of this act. The CPO and
201 the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia (“OAG”) shall have authority to
202 investigate and enforce this act.
203 Sec 6. Chief Privacy Officer.
204 (a) There is established within the Office of the Chief Technology Officer (“OCTO”) a
205 Chief Privacy Officer (“CPO”) that shall be appointed by the Chief Technology Officer
206 (“CTO”). The CPO shall be a member in good standing with the DC Bar.
207 (b) The CPO shall:
208 (1) Be directly responsible for coordinating the related responsibilities of
209 cybersecurity, data governance, and privacy.
210 (2) Develop and implement written policies and procedures to ensure the privacy
211 and security of covered individuals’ personal data;
212 (3) Ensure compliance with applicable federal and state laws and regulations
213 relating to data privacy;
10

214 (4) Issue written findings, recommendations, or directives to an agency to ensure
215 compliance with this act, including requiring the agency to modify its practices, implement
216 safeguards, or cease unlawful data processing activities, and may coordinate with OAG to ensure
217 compliance;
218 (5) Conduct or require privacy impact assessments for applicable information
219 technology systems or programs;
220 (6) Establish government-wide standards for the collection, use, retention, and
221 disclosure of covered individuals’ personal data and sensitive data;
222 (7) Coordinate with the Chief Data Officer, Chief Information Officer, or
223 equivalent positions, regarding the investigation and notification of breaches of personal data;
224 (8) Provide training and guidance to agencies regarding data privacy requirements
225 and best practices;
226 (9) Conduct periodic reviews of agency practices relating to the handling of
227 personal data;
228 (10) Receive and resolve complaints;
229 (11) Receive and resolve disputes among agencies related to data privacy in
230 writing;
231 (12) Participate in audits related to data privacy conducted by the District of
232 Columbia Auditor and the Office of the Inspector General;
233 (13) Provide an annual report to the CTO to publish in August of every year
234 beginning after the effective date of this act, and
235 (14) Advise the CTO on matters relating to privacy and data protection.
236 (d) The CPO shall, in partnership with agencies:
11

237 (1) Develop a process by which covered individuals may appeal data request
238 decisions made by agencies; and,
239 (2) Develop a data privacy bill of rights, accessible to covered individuals on the
240 CPO’s webpage, and directly linked on webpages of agencies that collect or process personal
241 data of covered individuals.
242 Sec 7. Enforcement
243 (a) The OAG may issue written findings, recommendations, or directives to an agency to
244 ensure compliance with this act, including requiring the agency to modify its practices,
245 implement safeguards, or cease unlawful data processing activities.
246 (b) The OAG may require an agency to enter into a compliance agreement that includes
247 specific corrective actions, timelines for implementation, and ongoing monitoring or reporting
248 obligations.
249 (c) An agency found to be in violation of this act may be subject to appropriate
250 administrative remedies under District law, including required remediation, changes to data
251 practices, training requirements, or other corrective measures designed to ensure future
252 compliance.
253 (d) The OAG may require periodic reporting from agencies regarding their data practices,
254 risk assessments, data sharing activities, and compliance with this act.
255 (e) In determining the appropriate remedy or corrective action, the OAG may consider
256 the nature and seriousness of the violation, the number of individuals affected, the sensitivity of
257 the data, the risk of harm, whether the violation was part of a pattern or practice, and whether the
258 violation resulted from human or technical error.
12

259 (f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any authority of the OAG under
260 District law or to impair the application of any other law governing the conduct of District
261 agencies.
262 Sec 8. Applicability
263 (a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
264 budget and financial plan.
265 (b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
266 an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
267 of the certification.
268 (c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
269 the District of Columbia Register.
270 (2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
271 applicability of this act.
272 Sec. 9. Fiscal impact statement.
273 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
274 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
275 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
276 Sec. 10. Effective date.
277 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
278 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
279 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
280 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
13